Utah statutes.
75-3-815.   Administration in more than one state -- Duty of personal
representative.
(1) All assets of estates being administered in this state are subject to all
claims, allowances, and charges existing or established against the personal
representative wherever appointed.
(2)  If the estate either in this state or as a whole is insufficient to cover
all family exemptions and allowances determined by the law of the decedent's
domicile, prior charges and claims, after satisfaction of the exemptions,
allowances and charges, each claimant whose claim has been allowed either in
this state or elsewhere in administrations of which the personal
representative is aware, is entitled to receive payment of an equal proportion
of his claim. If a preference or security in regard to a claim is allowed in
another jurisdiction but not in this state, the creditor so benefited is to
receive dividends from local assets only upon the balance of his claim after
deducting the amount of the benefit.
(3)  In case the family exemptions and allowances, prior charges and claims of
the entire estate exceed the total value of the portions of the estate being
administered separately and this state is not the state of the decedent's last
domicile, the claims allowed in this state shall be paid their proportion if
local assets are adequate for the purpose, and the balance of local assets
shall be transferred to the domiciliary personal representative. If local
assets are not sufficient to pay all claims allowed in this state the amount
to which they are entitled, local assets shall be marshalled so that each
claim allowed in this state is paid its proportion as far as possible, after
taking into account all dividends on claims allowed in this state from assets
in other jurisdictions.
